test/src/gt-desc-yamls/proper-even_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Even syllable propers belonging to OY-plc, HAWAII-plc, SKOHTERMADII-plc, SIJTE-plc, NYSTØ-plc, MARJA-U-plc, MARJA-I-plc, BERN-ani/BERN-plc,
# DUBAI-sur, HEANDARAT-plc, VARGGAT-plc, ALEUHTAT-plc, ACCRA-plc, NIKOSIIJA-obj,
# NYSTØ, C-FI-NEN-sur, RONDANE-obj, SKANIK-plc, ALBMOTMUSEA-obj

Tests:

  Proper - Bissau: # BISSAU-plc
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bissau
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Bissauii, Bissauiii]
    Bissau+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [bissaulažžii, bissaulažžai]


  Proper - Algrøy: # OY-plc
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Algrøya
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Algrøyai, Algrøyaii]
    Algrøy+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [algrøyalažžii, algrøyalažžai]

  Proper - Hawaii: # HAWAII-plc
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Hawaii, Hawaii-a, Hawaii-, Hawaiia, Hawaii', "Hawaii:", "Hawaii:a", Hawaii'a]
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Hawaiijii, Hawaiii, Hawaii'ai, Hawaii-j, Hawaii-ii, Hawaiiii, "Hawaii:ai", Hawaii'ii, Hawaii-ai, Hawaii'j, "Hawaii:ii", "Hawaii:j", Hawaiiai]
    Hawaii+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [hawaiilažžii, hawaiilažžai]

  Proper - Nordlánddaruovdemáđii: # SKOHTERMADII-plc
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđii, Nordlánddaruovdemáđija, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeaji, Nordlánddaruovdemáđi]
    Nordlánddaruovdemáđii+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Nordlánddaruovdemáđidjii, Nordlánddaruovdemáđeadjái]

  Proper - Gaarphkdaelie: # SIJTE-plc
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Gaarphkdaelie
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: [Gaarphkdaeliei, Gaarphkdaelieii]
    Gaarphkdaelie+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [gaarphkdaelielažžii, gaarphkdaelielažžai]

  Proper - Bittersjø: # NYSTØ-plc
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Bittersjø, Bittersjø'a, Bittersjø-a, "Bittersjø:", Bittersjøa, Bittersjø', "Bittersjø:a", Bittersjø-]
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: ["Bittersjøi", Bittersjø-ai, Bittersjø-ii, Bittersjø'j, Bittersjø-j, Bittersjø'ai, Bittersjøai, "Bittersjø:j", Bittersjø'ii, "Bittersjø:ii", Bittersjøii, "Bittersjø:ai"]
    Bittersjø+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [bittersjølažžii, bittersjølažžai]

  Proper - Klareatnu: # MARJA-U-plc
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Klareanu, Klareano]
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Klaretnui, Klaretnuii]
    Klareatnu+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [klareatnulažžii, klareatnulažžai]

  Proper - Klemmoaivi: # MARJA-I-plc
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Klemmoaivvi, Klemmoaivve]
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Klemmoaivái, Klemmoaiváii]
    Klemmoaivi+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [klemmoaivilažžii, klemmoaivilažžai]
    
  Proper - Kerberos: # BERN-ani/BERN-plc
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Kerberosa, Kerberos, "Kerberos:a", "Kerberos:", Kerberos-a, Kerberos-]
    Kerberos+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Kerberosii, "Kerberos:ii", "Kerberos:i", Kerberos-ii, Kerberos-i]

  Proper - Stai: # DUBAI-sur
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Staja, Stai, Staia, Stai-, Stai-a, "Sta:ia", "Stai:a", "Stai:"]
    Stai+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Stajii, Stai-ii, Stai-i, "Sta:iii", "Sta:ii", Staiii, "Stai:ii", "Stai:i"]

  Proper - Sieinnus-Návggastat: # HEANDARAT-plc
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Sieinnus-Návggastaga, Seainnus/Návggastaga]
    Sieinnus-Návggastat+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Sieinnus-Návggastahkii, Seainnus/Návggastahkii]

  Proper - Šleađut: # VARGGAT-plc
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Šleađuid
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Šleađuide
    Šleađut+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [šleađutlažžii, šleađutlažžai]

  Proper - Doaresdievát: # ALEUHTAT-plc
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Doaresdieváid
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Doaresdieváide
    Doaresdievát+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [doaresdievátlažžii, doaresdievátlažžai, doaresdievválažžii, doaresdievválažžai]

  Proper - Romania: # ACCRA-plc
    Romania+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Romania]
    Romania+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Romaniai, Romaniaii]
    Romania+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [romanialažžii, romanialažžai]

  Proper - Kaffegalleriija: # NIKOSIIJA-obj
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Kaffegalleriija
    Kaffegalleriija+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Kaffegalleriijai, Kaffegalleriijaii]

  Proper - Bergsjø: # NYSTØ
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Bergsjø, Bergsjøa, "Bergsjø:", "Bergsjø:a", Bergsjø-, Bergsjø-a, Bergsjø', Bergsjø'a]
    Bergsjø+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Bergsjøi, Bergsjøii, Bergsjøai, "Bergsjø:ai", "Bergsjø:j", "Bergsjø:ii", Bergsjø-ai, Bergsjø-j, Bergsjø-ii, Bergsjø'ai, Bergsjø'j, Bergsjø'ii]

  Proper - Sottinen: # C-FI-NEN-sur
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: [Sottinena, Sottisa, Sottinen, "Sottinen:a", "Sottinen:", Sottinen-a, Sottinen-]
    Sottinen+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: [Sottinenii, Sottisii, "Sottinen:ii", Sottinen-ii, "Sottinen:i", Sottinen-i]

  Proper - BackOffice: # RONDANE-obj
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: BackOffice
    BackOffice+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: BackOfficii
    
  Proper - Baikalágojávrrik: # SKANIK-plc
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: [Baikalágojávrriid, Baikalágojávrrik]
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Baikalágojávrriide
    Baikalágojávrrik+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [baikalágojávrriklažžii, baikalágojávrriklažžai]

  Proper - Eksekutivkomitea: # ALBMOTMUSEA-obj
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Eksekutivkomitea
    Eksekutivkomitea+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Eksekutivkomiteii
